Utah statutes.
70A-9a-302.   Law governing perfection and priority of agricultural liens.

While farm products are located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of an agricultural lien on the farm products.



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session

